cs: Typ svorek baterie: Šroub; Faston F1 (0,187 palce plochý); Faston F2 (0,250 palce plochý); Faston F3 (0,110 palce plochý); Samičí čep; Praporková svorka; Závitová vložka (M5); Závitová vložka (M6); Samčí čep; Matice a šroub (M5); Matice a šroub (M6); T1; T2; Drátové vývody; Jiné
vi: Loại cực pin: Bu lông; Faston f1 (0,187 in spade); Faston f2 (0,250 in spade); Faston f3 (0,110 in spade); Cọc cái; Cực cờ; Chèn ren (m5); Chèn ren (m6); Cọc đực; Đai ốc & bu lông (m5); Đai ốc & bu lông (m6); T1; T2; Dây dẫn; Khác
ja: バッテリー端子タイプ: ボルト; ファストンF1（0.187インチスペード）; ファストンF2（0.250インチスペード）; ファストンF3（0.110インチスペード）; メススタッド; フラッグターミナル; インサートネジ式（M5）; インサートネジ式（M6）; オススタッド; ナット&ボルト（M5）; ナット&ボルト（M6）; T1; T2; ワイヤーリード; その他
fr: Type de bornes de la batterie: Boulon; Faston F1 (cosse 0,187 po); Faston F2 (cosse 0,250 po); Faston F3 (cosse 0,110 po); Goujon femelle; Borne drapeau; Insert fileté (M5); Insert fileté (M6); Goujon mâle; Écrou et boulon (M5); Écrou et boulon (M6); T1; T2; Fils de connexion; Autre
nb: Batteriterminaltype: Bolt; Faston F1 (0,187" flatstikk); Faston F2 (0,250" flatstikk); Faston F3 (0,110" flatstikk); Hunnbolt; Flaggterminal; Gjenget innfelt (M5); Gjenget innfelt (M6); Hannbolt; Mutter og bolt (M5); Mutter og bolt (M6); T1; T2; Ledninger; Annet
hr-HR: Tip terminala baterije: Vijak; Faston F1 (0,187 inča lopatica); Faston F2 (0,250 inča lopatica); Faston F3 (0,110 inča lopatica); Ženski priključak; Krilni terminal; Umetnuti navoj (M5); Umetnuti navoj (M6); Muški priključak; Matica i vijak (M5); Matica i vijak (M6); T1; T2; Žičani vodovi; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipo de terminal da bateria: Parafuso; Faston F1 (terminal de 0,187 pol); Faston F2 (terminal de 0,250 pol); Faston F3 (terminal de 0,110 pol); Terminal fêmea; Terminal de bandeira; Inserto roscado (M5); Inserto roscado (M6); Terminal macho; Porca e parafuso (M5); Porca e parafuso (M6); T1; T2; Cabos de ligação; Outro
zh-TW: 電池端子類型: 螺栓; Faston F1 (0.187 吋插片); Faston F2 (0.250 吋插片); Faston F3 (0.110 吋插片); 母螺柱; 旗形端子; 內螺紋插入 (M5); 內螺紋插入 (M6); 公螺柱; 螺帽與螺栓 (M5); 螺帽與螺栓 (M6); T1; T2; 導線引線; 其他
sl-SI: Tip terminalov baterije: Vijak; Faston F1 (0,187 palca ploščat); Faston F2 (0,250 palca ploščat); Faston F3 (0,110 palca ploščat); Ženski čep; Zastavični priključek; Vstavek z navojem (M5); Vstavek z navojem (M6); Moški čep; Matica in vijak (M5); Matica in vijak (M6); T1; T2; Žični vodniki; Drugo
nl: Type batterijterminal: Bout; Faston F1 (0,187 inch steekverbinding); Faston F2 (0,250 inch steekverbinding); Faston F3 (0,110 inch steekverbinding); Vrouwelijke stift; Vlagaansluiting; Inzetstuk schroefdraad (M5); Inzetstuk schroefdraad (M6); Mannelijke stift; Moer en bout (M5); Moer en bout (M6); T1; T2; Draadaansluitingen; Andere
es: Tipo de terminal de la batería: Perno; Faston F1 (terminal plano de 0,187 pulg.); Faston F2 (terminal plano de 0,250 pulg.); Faston F3 (terminal plano de 0,110 pulg.); Espárrago hembra; Terminal de bandera; Inserto roscado (M5); Inserto roscado (M6); Espárrago macho; Tuerca y perno (M5); Tuerca y perno (M6); T1; T2; Cables conductores; Otros
el: Τύπος ακροδέκτη μπαταρίας: Μπουλόνι; Faston F1 (0,187 in spade); Faston F2 (0,250 in spade); Faston F3 (0,110 in spade); Θηλυκό καρφί; Ακροδέκτης σημαίας; Ένθετο με σπείρωμα (M5); Ένθετο με σπείρωμα (M6); Αρσενικό καρφί; Παξιμάδι & μπουλόνι (M5); Παξιμάδι & μπουλόνι (M6); T1; T2; Καλώδια; Άλλο
pl: Typ zacisku akumulatora: Śruba; Faston F1 (0,187 cala płaski); Faston F2 (0,250 cala płaski); Faston F3 (0,110 cala płaski); Żeński kołek; Terminal flagowy; Wkładka gwintowana (M5); Wkładka gwintowana (M6); Męski kołek; Nakrętka i śruba (M5); Nakrętka i śruba (M6); T1; T2; Przewody; Inne
sk-SK: Typ batériových svoriek: Skrutka; Faston F1 (0,187 palca plochý); Faston F2 (0,250 palca plochý); Faston F3 (0,110 palca plochý); Samičí kolík; Vlajkový terminál; Závitová vložka (M5); Závitová vložka (M6); Samčí kolík; Matica a skrutka (M5); Matica a skrutka (M6); T1; T2; Drôtové vývody; Iné
zh-CN: 电池端子类型: 螺栓; Faston F1（0.187 英寸片状）; Faston F2（0.250 英寸片状）; Faston F3（0.110 英寸片状）; 母螺柱; 旗形端子; 插入式螺纹 (M5); 插入式螺纹 (M6); 公螺柱; 螺母螺栓 (M5); 螺母螺栓 (M6); T1; T2; 导线引线; 其他
th: ประเภทขั้วแบตเตอรี่: สลักเกลียว; Faston F1 (แบบขา 0.187 นิ้ว); Faston F2 (แบบขา 0.250 นิ้ว); Faston F3 (แบบขา 0.110 นิ้ว); ขั้วเมียแบบสตั๊ด; ขั้วแบบธง; เกลียวใน (M5); เกลียวใน (M6); ขั้วผู้แบบสตั๊ด; น็อตและสลัก (M5); น็อตและสลัก (M6); T1; T2; สายไฟ; อื่นๆ
tr: Pil terminal tipi: Cıvata; Faston F1 (0,187 inç yassı); Faston F2 (0,250 inç yassı); Faston F3 (0,110 inç yassı); Dişi saplama; Bayrak terminal; Dişli gömme (M5); Dişli gömme (M6); Erkek saplama; Somun ve cıvata (M5); Somun ve cıvata (M6); T1; T2; Kablo uçları; Diğer
ko: 배터리 단자 유형: 볼트; 패스턴 F1 (0.187인치 스페이드); 패스턴 F2 (0.250인치 스페이드); 패스턴 F3 (0.110인치 스페이드); 암 스터드; 플래그 단자; 인서트 나사식 (M5); 인서트 나사식 (M6); 수 스터드; 너트 & 볼트 (M5); 너트 & 볼트 (M6); T1; T2; 와이어 리드; 기타
lt-LT: Baterijos gnybto tipas: Varžtas; Faston F1 (0,187 colio plokštelinė jungtis); Faston F2 (0,250 colio plokštelinė jungtis); Faston F3 (0,110 colio plokštelinė jungtis); Lizdas; Vėliavėlės tipo gnybtas; Srieginė įdėkla (M5); Srieginė įdėkla (M6); Kištukas; Veržlė ir varžtas (M5); Veržlė ir varžtas (M6); T1; T2; Laidiniai gnybtai; Kita
fi: Akun napatyyppi: Pultti; Faston F1 (0,187 tuuman liitäntä); Faston F2 (0,250 tuuman liitäntä); Faston F3 (0,110 tuuman liitäntä); Naarastappi; Lippuliitin; Sisäkierre (M5); Sisäkierre (M6); Urostappi; Mutteri ja pultti (M5); Mutteri ja pultti (M6); T1; T2; Johtoliitännät; Muu
bg-BG: Тип клеми на батерията: Болт; Faston F1 (0,187 инча лопатка); Faston F2 (0,250 инча лопатка); Faston F3 (0,110 инча лопатка); Женски болт; Флагов терминал; Резбова вставка (M5); Резбова вставка (M6); Мъжки болт; Гайка и болт (M5); Гайка и болт (M6); T1; T2; Проводници; Други
pt-BR: Tipo de terminal da bateria: Parafuso; Faston F1 (terminal tipo pá 0,187 pol); Faston F2 (terminal tipo pá 0,250 pol); Faston F3 (terminal tipo pá 0,110 pol); Pino fêmea; Terminal tipo bandeira; Inserto rosqueado (M5); Inserto rosqueado (M6); Pino macho; Porca e parafuso (M5); Porca e parafuso (M6); T1; T2; Terminais de fio; Outro
it: Tipo di terminale della batteria: Bullone; Faston F1 (0,187 pollici a forcella); Faston F2 (0,250 pollici a forcella); Faston F3 (0,110 pollici a forcella); Perno femmina; Terminale a bandiera; Inserto filettato (M5); Inserto filettato (M6); Perno maschio; Dado e bullone (M5); Dado e bullone (M6); T1; T2; Cavi volanti; Altro
hu: Akkumulátorkivezetés típusa: Csavar; Faston F1 (0,187 hüvelyk lapos); Faston F2 (0,250 hüvelyk lapos); Faston F3 (0,110 hüvelyk lapos); Női csatlakozós; Zászlós csatlakozó; Behelyezhető menet (M5); Behelyezhető menet (M6); Férfi csatlakozós; Anya és csavar (M5); Anya és csavar (M6); T1; T2; Vezetékes kivezetések; Egyéb
en: Battery terminal type: Bolt; Faston F1 (0.187 in spade); Faston F2 (0.250 in spade); Faston F3 (0.110 in spade); Female stud; Flag terminal; Insert threaded (M5); Insert threaded (M6); Male stud; Nut & bolt (M5); Nut & bolt (M6); T1; T2; Wire leads; Other
de: Batterieanschlusstyp: Schraube; Faston F1 (4,75 mm Flachstecker); Faston F2 (6,35 mm Flachstecker); Faston F3 (2,8 mm Flachstecker); Buchse; Fahnenanschluss; Gewindeeinsatz (M5); Gewindeeinsatz (M6); Stecker; Mutter und Schraube (M5); Mutter und Schraube (M6); T1; T2; Kabelanschlüsse; Sonstiges
da: Batteriterminaltype: Bolt; Faston F1 (0,187 tommer spade); Faston F2 (0,250 tommer spade); Faston F3 (0,110 tommer spade); Hunstik; Flagterminal; Indsats med gevind (M5); Indsats med gevind (M6); Hanstik; Møtrik & bolt (M5); Møtrik & bolt (M6); T1; T2; Ledninger; Andet
ro-RO: Tip de terminal al bateriei: Șurub; Faston F1 (terminal plat 0,187 in); Faston F2 (terminal plat 0,250 in); Faston F3 (terminal plat 0,110 in); Știft feminin; Terminal tip steag; Insert filetat (M5); Insert filetat (M6); Știft masculin; Piuliță și șurub (M5); Piuliță și șurub (M6); T1; T2; Fire de conexiune; Altele
sv: Batteriterminalstyp: Bult; Faston F1 (0,187 tum flatkontakt); Faston F2 (0,250 tum flatkontakt); Faston F3 (0,110 tum flatkontakt); Honpinne; Flaggterminal; Insätsgängad (M5); Insätsgängad (M6); Hanpinne; Mutter och bult (M5); Mutter och bult (M6); T1; T2; Trådledningar; Övrigt
ru: Тип клемм батареи: Болт; Faston F1 (0,187 дюйма лопатка); Faston F2 (0,250 дюйма лопатка); Faston F3 (0,110 дюйма лопатка); Гнездовая шпилька; Флажковый терминал; Резьбовая вставка (M5); Резьбовая вставка (M6); Штыревая шпилька; Гайка и болт (M5); Гайка и болт (M6); T1; T2; Проводные выводы; Другой